Utah statutes.
4-18-2.   Purpose declaration.

(1)  The Legislature finds and declares that the soil and water resources of this state constitute one of its basic assets and that the preservation of these resources requires planning and programs to ensure the development and utilization of these resources and to protect them from the adverse effects of wind and water erosion, sediment, and sediment related pollutants.

(2)  The Legislature finds that local production of food is essential for:

(a)  the security of the state's food supply; and

(b)  the self sufficiency of the state's citizens.

(3)  The Legislature finds that sustainable agriculture is critical to:

(a)  the success of rural communities;

(b)  the historical culture of the state;

(c)  maintaining healthy farmland;

(d)  maintaining high water quality;

(e)  maintaining abundant wildlife; and

(f)  high-quality recreation for citizens of the state.

(4)  The Legislature finds that livestock grazing on public lands is important for the proper management, maintenance, and health of public lands in the state.

(5)  The Legislature encourages each agricultural producer in the state to operate in a reasonable and responsible manner to maintain the integrity of land, soil, water, and air.

(6)  To encourage each agricultural producer in this state to operate in a reasonable and responsible manner to maintain the integrity of the state's resources, the state shall offer a certification of environmental stewardship as defined in Section 4-18-3.

